Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 8 DISABILITY AND SURVIVOR BENEFITS
31-31-805. Change in disability status - reexamination.

At any time that a total disability, including an on-duty disability pursuant to section 31-31-806.5 (1), ceases to exist, based upon periodic reexamination as may be required by the board or based upon other evidence of ability to engage in substantial gainful activity, a member retired for such disability shall be declared permanently occupationally disabled, and the benefits provided by section 31-31-803 (1) or 31-31-806.5 (1) shall be reduced to the level provided in section 31-31-803 (2.1). The five-year limitation on investigations contained in section 31-31-803 (4)(b) shall not be applicable to the enforcement of this subsection (1).

At any time that an occupational disability, including an on-duty disability pursuant to section 31-31-806.5 (2), ceases to exist, based upon periodic reexamination as may be required by the board, a member retired for such disability may be restored to active service, and the benefits provided by section 31-31-803 or 31-31-806.5 (2) shall be discontinued. The member shall be restored to active service by the member's former employer if a vacancy exists in the same position the member held prior to retirement, or if there is a position of equal base pay available, or if the member agrees to accept another available position that may not be the same or of equal base pay to the member's former position.

In addition, if the position to which the member will be restored requires, as a matter of state law, that the member maintain any type of state certification, the employer need not restore the member to such position if the member does not have the necessary certification or the member's certification has otherwise lapsed, expired, or been revoked. The employer, however, must afford the member an opportunity to attain certification, recertification, or reactivation of an existing certification and must hold open any position that the member has agreed to accept pursuant to this subsection (2) for a period not to exceed one year. The board is directed to evaluate the impact of this requirement on employers of association members. The one-year period may extend beyond the five-year limitation set forth in paragraph (f) of this subsection (2), as long as the opening occurs within the five-year period. Disability benefits will be continued during any period, not to exceed one year, that the member is attempting to attain certification, recertification, or reactivation.

If, at the time of a board finding that a member's occupational disability has ceased to exist, there is no opening in the same position the member held prior to retirement or one of equal base pay and there is no opening in a position of lesser base pay that the member agrees to accept, the board may order the member to proceed with any necessary training in order to attain, reinstate, or reactivate any certification required for the position from which the member retired. Disability benefits shall be continued during the training period up to a maximum of one year.

If the member refuses to take the steps necessary to attain certification, recertification, or reactivation as required by paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (2), or if at the end of the one-year limitation on attaining certification, recertification, or reactivation the member has not attained the necessary certification, recertification, or reactivation, disability benefits shall be discontinued, and the employer shall be relieved of further obligations pursuant to this subsection (2).

If a member refuses to accept the same or a position of equal base pay, the benefits provided by section 31-31-803 shall be discontinued, but a member shall not lose benefits if there is no such vacancy or if the member refuses to accept a position that is not the same or of equal base pay to the member's former position, or if the employer refuses to restore the member to active service, except as provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

If at least two members of the three-member physician panel examining the member agree that an occupational disability ceases to exist, if the board determines that such disability ceases to exist, and if no appropriate vacancy is available at that time, the member shall have the first right of refusal to fill such a vacancy if it occurs within five years from the date of original disablement. In the event an occupational disability is based on a medical determination of mental impairment or disease, all three members of the physician panel must agree, and the board must determine, that the occupational disability ceases to exist before the member is granted such first right of refusal.

At least thirty days prior to making its determination, the board shall provide written notice to the employer and member of the agreement of the appropriate number of physicians and of the opportunity for a hearing, upon request of the employer or member, before the board. If a hearing is requested, the board shall provide the employer with copies of the medical reports prepared by the physician panel with respect to any examination or reexamination of the member. Neither the employer, the agents of the employer, including any physician retained to review such reports, nor the association shall release such reports to any other person except as otherwise allowed pursuant to section 24-72-204 (3)(a)(I), C.R.S.

If the member refuses a vacancy in the same position the member held prior to retirement or in a position of equal base pay to the member's former position, the benefits provided by section 31-31-803 shall be discontinued. Except as otherwise provided pursuant to this subsection (2), if the employer refuses to allow a member who exercises such first right of refusal to fill the vacancy, the employer shall thereafter pay the cost of the benefits provided by section 31-31-803.

When a temporary occupational disability ceases to exist and the member is restored to active service with the member's employer, a transfer will be made from the statewide death and disability plan to the member's normal retirement plan in the amount of the monthly employer and employee contributions being made to the member's pension plan at the time of disability but not more than sixteen percent of the monthly base salary that the member was being paid at the time of disability retirement, multiplied by the number of months the member received temporary occupational disability benefits. The member will receive service credit for such transfer. A restored member of a local plan which has a contribution rate in excess of sixteen percent shall have the difference between the amount transferred and the amount that would have been contributed at the excess rate, made up by an additional contribution from the employer.

(2.5) When a member on temporary occupational disability satisfies the age and service requirements for a normal retirement, including the time the member was on temporary occupational disability, a transfer shall be made from the statewide death and disability plan to the member's normal retirement plan in the amount of the monthly employer and employee contributions being made to the member's pension plan at the time of disability but not more than sixteen percent of the monthly base salary that the member was being paid at the time of disability retirement, multiplied by the number of months the member received temporary occupational disability benefits. A member of a statewide or local retirement plan that has a mandatory contribution rate in excess of sixteen percent shall have the difference between the amount transferred and the amount that would have been contributed at the excess rate made up by an additional contribution from the employer. The member shall then be granted a normal retirement under the member's normal retirement plan and the temporary occupational disability benefits under the statewide death and disability plan shall terminate.

Within five years from the date of a board finding of occupational disability pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or from the date of original disablement pursuant to section 31-31-803 (2), (2.1), or (2.2), a member retired for such disability may be declared totally disabled based upon periodic reexamination as ordered by the board in its discretion. If the member is declared totally disabled, the benefits provided by section 31-31-803 (2), (2.1), or (2.2) shall be increased to the level provided in section 31-31-803 (1).

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 930, § 1, effective May 23; (1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 318, § 6, effective November 17.

L. 2002:

(1), (2)(e), (2)(h), and (3) amended and (2)(i) and (2.5) added, pp. 179, 180, §§ 6, 7, effective October 1.

L. 2009:

(2.5) amended, (SB 09-017), ch. 53, p. 191, § 5, effective March 25.

L. 2016:

(2)(i) and (2.5) amended, (HB 16-1028), ch. 25, p. 59, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as § 31-30-1007 (1.5), (2)(b), and (2)(c).

31-31-806. Disqualification upon reemployment.

If, subsequent to disability benefits being awarded to a member pursuant to the provisions of section 31-31-803 or 31-31-806.5, but prior to a decision of the board that an occupational disability ceases to exist pursuant to section 31-31-805 (2), a member is employed or reemployed in this state or any other jurisdiction, pursuant to either an agreement or court order, in a full-time salaried position that normally involves working at least one thousand six hundred hours in any given calendar year and the duties of which are directly involved with the provision of police or fire protection as determined by the board, the benefits provided pursuant to section 31-31-803 shall be discontinued. Any application for retirement for disability made by the member after such appointment or reinstatement shall be treated in all respects as a new application. The five-year limitation on investigations contained in section 31-31-803 (4)(b) shall not be applicable to the enforcement of this section.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 932, § 1, effective May 23; entire section amended, p. 318, § 7, effective November 17.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 181, § 8, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1007 (3.5).

31-31-806.5. Disability benefits - on-duty.

If the board determines that a member, who is otherwise eligible to apply for disability retirement benefits under section 31-31-803, is required to terminate the member's regular employment due to a total disability, as defined in section 31-31-801 (4), that is the result of an injury received while performing official duties or an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the member's employment, the member is eligible for a disability benefit in an amount provided for in section 31-31-803 (1).

If the board determines that a member who is otherwise eligible to apply for disability retirement benefits under section 31-31-803 is required to terminate the member's regular employment due to an occupational disability, a temporary occupational disability, or a permanent occupational disability that, regardless of the type of occupational disability, is the result of an injury received while performing official duties or an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the member's employment, the member is eligible for a disability benefit in an amount provided for in section 31-31-803.

The board shall promulgate rules that specify standards for determining whether a member's disability is the result of an injury received while performing official duties or an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of employment and that establish procedures for making such determination.

The board shall promulgate rules that specify the method of reviewing existing disability retirement awards to determine whether a member's total disability or occupational disability is the result of an injury received while performing official duties or an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the member's employment and that establish procedures for making such determination, including the appointment of hearing officers to conduct hearings.

The determinations made by the board pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be made solely on the basis of the medical evidence that was previously submitted in connection with the member's application for disability retirement benefits and other relevant evidence that is contemporaneous in time with the termination of the member's employment.

Any decision made by the board to change a member's existing disability retirement award to an on-duty disability retirement benefit under this section shall operate on a prospective basis from the date of the board's decision.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 315, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 198, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 181, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-017), ch. 53, p. 192, § 6, effective March 25.

31-31-807. Death of member - survivor benefits.

If a member dies while in active service or while on temporary occupational disability under section 31-31-803 (2.2) and leaves a surviving spouse or dependent children, or both, one of the survivor benefits described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall be paid if the member:

Is not eligible for a normal retirement pension under an old hire pension plan established pursuant to article 30.5 of this title that provides for postretirement survivor benefits to a spouse and dependent children in the event the member dies in active service while eligible for normal retirement; and

Is not eligible for the normal retirement pension from a plan that is part of the defined benefit system pursuant to section 31-31-204; or

Has not reached age fifty-five with twenty-five years of accumulated service as a member and is a participant under the statewide money purchase plan pursuant to part 5 of this article or under a local money purchase plan.

One of the following survivor benefits shall be paid if the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) are satisfied:

When there is a surviving spouse and no dependent children, the monthly benefit shall be forty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is a surviving spouse and one dependent child, the monthly benefit shall be forty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is a surviving spouse and two or more dependent children, the monthly benefit shall be fifty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is no surviving spouse and three or more dependent children, the monthly benefit shall be fifty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is no surviving spouse and two dependent children, the monthly benefit shall be forty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is no surviving spouse and one dependent child, the monthly benefit shall be forty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

Any benefit provided in accordance with this section to the surviving spouse or dependent child of a member who dies while in active service shall terminate upon the death of the surviving spouse or upon the death or termination of dependency of such dependent child, as defined in section 31-31-801 (2), as applicable.

When there is a surviving spouse and one dependent child residing in a separate household from the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse shall receive twenty-five percent of the monthly base salary and the child shall receive the balance of the benefit pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section.

When there is a surviving spouse and two or more dependent children residing in a separate household from the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse shall receive twenty-five percent of the monthly base salary and the children shall receive the balance of the benefit pursuant to subparagraph (III) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section.

Upon the termination of the benefit payable to the child or children pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (3), the surviving spouse shall receive the benefit pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section.

In the event that a survivor benefit is payable for the benefit of more than one dependent child of the member pursuant to subparagraph (III), (IV), or (V) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section and the dependent children reside in separate households from each other, the benefit shall be divided equally among the children.

Any surviving spouse or dependent child receiving benefits pursuant to subparagraph (I) or (VI) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section prior to January 1, 2002, shall receive any increased benefit established in subparagraph (I) or (VI) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section on January 1, 2002, as applicable.

The survivor benefits payable under the statewide death and disability plan established in this part 8 shall be redetermined effective October 1 each year, and such redetermined amount shall be payable for the following twelve months. To be eligible for redetermination, such benefits shall have been paid for at least twelve calendar months prior to the effective date of redetermination. The annual redetermination of benefits made pursuant to this section shall be in lieu of any other annual cost of living adjustment.

For the redetermination of survivor benefits payable pursuant to this section, the amount of the benefit on the effective date of the benefit shall be increased by a percentage to be determined by the board but not more than three percent for each full year contained in the period commencing with the effective date of the benefit and ending with the effective date of the redetermination.

The cost of the adjustment of benefits provided by this section shall be funded in the same manner as other benefits established by this part 8.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 933, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 99:

(2) added, p. 375, § 2, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 424, § 13, effective June 1; entire section amended, p. 80, § 1, effective January 1, 2002.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1029, § 57, effective June 1; IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(II)(A) amended and (6) added, p. 181, § 10, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 271, § 3, effective March 29.

L. 2012:

(1)(a)(II)(A) amended, (HB 12-1018), ch. 24, p. 65, § 5, effective August 8.

31-31-807.5. Death of member - line-of-duty - survivor benefits.

If a member dies while in active service as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained while performing official duties or as a result of an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the member's employment, and if such member qualifies for line-of-duty status under section 101 (h) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and leaves a surviving spouse or dependent children, or both, one of the survivor benefits described in either paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection (1) shall be paid if the member:

Is not eligible for a normal retirement pension under an old hire pension established pursuant to article 30.5 of this title that provides for postretirement survivor benefits to a spouse and dependent children in the event the member dies in active service while eligible for normal retirement; and

Is not eligible for the normal retirement pension from a plan that is part of the defined benefit system pursuant to section 31-31-204; or

Has not reached age fifty-five with twenty-five years of accumulated service as a member and is a participant under the statewide money purchase plan pursuant to part 5 of this article or under a local money purchase plan.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), one of the following survivor benefits shall be paid if the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) are satisfied:

When there is a surviving spouse and no dependent children, the monthly benefit shall be forty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is a surviving spouse and one dependent child, the monthly benefit shall be forty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is a surviving spouse and two or more dependent children, the monthly benefit shall be fifty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is no surviving spouse and three or more dependent children, the monthly benefit shall be fifty percent of the monthly base salary paid to each member immediately preceding death.

When there is no surviving spouse and two dependent children, the monthly benefit shall be forty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

When there is no surviving spouse and one dependent child, the monthly benefit shall be forty percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death.

For survivors who become eligible for survivor benefits on or after October 15, 2002, one of the following survivor benefits shall be paid if the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) are satisfied:

The monthly benefit when there is a surviving spouse, either with or without children, shall be seventy percent of the monthly base salary being paid to such member immediately preceding death.

The monthly benefit when there is no surviving spouse but a surviving child or children shall be:

Seventy percent of the monthly base salary being paid to such member immediately prior to death if the child or children were living in the member's home at the time of the member's death; or

Forty percent of the monthly base salary being paid to such member immediately prior to death for one child and fifteen percent for each additional child; except that the total benefit received shall not be greater than seventy percent of the monthly base salary if the child or children were not living in the member's home at the time of the member's death.

(1.5) (a) On or after October 1, 2001, if a member dies while in active service as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained while performing official duties or as a result of an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the member's employment, and if such member qualifies for line-of-duty status under section 101 (h) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and leaves a surviving spouse or dependent children, or both, one of the survivor benefits described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1.5) shall be paid if the member:

Is eligible for a normal retirement pension under an old hire pension established pursuant to article 30.5 of this title that provides for postretirement survivor benefits to a spouse and dependent children in the event the member dies in active service while eligible for normal retirement;

Is eligible for the normal retirement pension from a plan that is part of the defined benefit system pursuant to section 31-31-204; or

Has reached age fifty-five with twenty-five years of accumulated service as a member and is a participant under the statewide money purchase plan pursuant to part 5 of this article or under a local money purchase plan.

One of the following survivor benefits shall be paid if the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) are satisfied and if the survivor benefit currently received pursuant to subparagraph (I), (II), or (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) is less than seventy percent of the monthly base salary being paid to the member immediately preceding death:

The monthly benefit to be paid in addition to the monthly retirement benefit otherwise payable when there is a surviving spouse, either with or without children, shall be the difference between seventy percent of the monthly base salary paid to such member immediately preceding death and the amount payable pursuant to benefits received under the plan identified in subparagraph (I), (II), or (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5).

The monthly benefit to be paid in addition to the monthly retirement benefit otherwise payable when there is no surviving spouse but there is a surviving child or children shall be:

If the child or children were living in the member's home at the time of the member's death, the difference between seventy percent of the monthly base salary being paid to such member immediately preceding death and the amount payable pursuant to benefits received under the plan identified in subparagraph (I), (II), or (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5); or

If the child or children were not living in the member's home at the time of the member's death, the sum of forty percent of the monthly base salary being paid to such member immediately prior to death for the first child plus fifteen percent for each additional child, the total of which shall not be greater than seventy percent of the monthly base salary less the amount payable pursuant to benefits received under the plan identified in subparagraph (I), (II), or (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5).

Establish procedures for making such determinations, including the appointment of hearing officers to conduct hearings.

The board shall promulgate rules that specify standards and establish procedures for determining whether a member's death is the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained while performing official duties or an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of a member's employment and, in the case of a line-of-duty death, whether any of the exceptions specified in section 101 (h)(2) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, are applicable. The procedures established by the board may include the appointment of hearing officers to conduct hearings and make findings and recommendations to the board on any issue. The board may adopt rules to establish a process for the administrative approval of a death benefit application, including standards of review of applications, without board review. The board shall take any final action that constitutes a denial of a disability application or a reduction of a benefit.

The board shall promulgate rules that specify the method of reviewing existing survivor benefit awards to:

(I) Determine whether a member's death was the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained while performing official duties or as a result of an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the member's employment;

(II) Determine, in the case of line-of-duty deaths occurring after December 31, 1996, whether any of the exceptions specified in section 101 (h)(2) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, are applicable;

The determinations made by the board pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be made on the basis of the medical evidence that was previously submitted in connection with the application for survivor benefits and other relevant nontestimonial evidence.

Any decision made by the board to change an existing survivor benefit award to an on-duty survivor benefit under this subsection (3) shall operate on a prospective basis from the date of the board's decision.

Any benefit provided in accordance with this section to the surviving spouse or dependent child of a member who dies while in active service shall terminate upon the death of the surviving spouse or upon the death or termination of dependency of the dependent child, as defined in section 31-31-801 (2), as applicable.

When there is a surviving spouse and one dependent child residing in a separate household from the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse shall receive two-thirds of the benefit and the child shall receive the balance of the benefit pursuant to subsection (1) or (1.5) of this section.

When there is a surviving spouse and two or more dependent children residing in a separate household from the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse shall receive fifty percent of the benefit and the children shall receive the balance of the benefit pursuant to subsection (1) or (1.5) of this section.

Upon the termination of the benefit payable to the child or children pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (5), the surviving spouse shall receive the entire benefit pursuant to subsection (1) or (1.5) of this section.

In the event that a survivor benefit is payable for the benefit of more than one dependent child of the member pursuant to subsection (1) or (1.5) of this section and the dependent children reside in separate households from each other, the children's benefit shall be divided equally among the children.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 183, § 12, effective October 1, 2002.)

If a member dies while in active service as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained while performing official duties or as a result of an occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the member's employment and otherwise qualifies for benefits under subsection (1.5) of this section, but falls within one or more of the exceptions specified in section 101 (h)(2) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and leaves a surviving spouse or dependent children, or both, said survivors shall:

Receive benefits as allowed under section 31-31-807; or

Receive benefits as allowed under the member's normal retirement plan.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 60, § 1, effective February 8, 1999.

L. 2001:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 425, § 14, effective June 1; (1) amended and (4) to (7) added, p. 82, § 2, effective January 1, 2002.

L. 2002:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(II)(A), IP(1)(b), (5), (6), and (7) amended and (1)(c), (1.5), and (8) added, pp. 182, 183, §§ 11, 12, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(II)(A) and (1.5)(a)(II) amended, p. 271, § 4, effective March 29.

L. 2012:

(1)(a)(II)(A) and (1.5)(a)(II) amended, (HB 12-1018), ch. 24, p. 65, § 6, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1) was amended in House Bill 01-1011. Those amendments were superseded by the amendment of subsection (1) in House Bill 01-1027, effective January 1, 2002.

Cross references:

For section 101 (h)(2) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" referenced in this section, see 26 U.S.C. sec. 101 (h)(2).

31-31-808. Reduction of survivor benefits.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The benefits payable under sections 31-31-807 and 31-31-807.5 to the surviving spouse and dependent children of any member, who at the time of the member's death was a member of a money purchase plan established under this article or article 30.5 of this title, including any department chief, who at the time of the chief's death had been exempted from the statewide defined benefit plan as permitted by section 31-31-401 (4), shall be reduced by an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the benefits such surviving spouse and dependent children receive from the money purchase plan, whether the benefits received from the money purchase plan are paid on a periodic basis or in a lump sum. No such reduction shall exceed the actuarial equivalent of money purchase plan benefits if such benefits had been funded at the same rate of contributions specified in section 31-31-402 (1) and (2) as are required for benefits under section 31-31-403.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The benefits payable under sections 31-31-807 and 31-31-807.5 to the surviving spouse and dependent children of any member, who at the time of the member's death was a member of a money purchase plan established under this article or article 30.5 of this title 31, including any department chief, who at the time of the chief's death had been exempted from the statewide retirement plan as permitted by section 31-31.5-203, shall be reduced by an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the benefits such surviving spouse and dependent children receive from the money purchase plan, whether the benefits received from the money purchase plan are paid on a periodic basis or in a lump sum. No such reduction shall exceed the actuarial equivalent of money purchase plan benefits if such benefits had been funded at the same rate of contributions specified in section 31-31.5-301.

The benefits payable under sections 31-31-807 and 31-31-807.5 to the surviving spouse and dependent children of any member who are also receiving payments from the member's separate retirement account pursuant to section 31-31-406 shall be reduced by an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the benefits such surviving spouse and dependent children receive from the separate retirement account, whether the benefits received from the account are paid on a periodic basis or in a lump sum.

The benefits payable under sections 31-31-807 and 31-31-807.5 to the surviving spouse and dependent children of any member who are also receiving payments from a statewide or local Colorado fire or police defined benefit pension plan shall be reduced by the amount of the defined benefit payments to be received.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 933, § 1, effective May 23; entire section amended, p. 1339, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 62, § 4, effective February 8, 1999.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 185, § 13, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

(3) added, p. 272, § 5, effective March 29.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-017), ch. 53, p. 192, § 7, effective March 25.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1018), ch. 24, p. 66, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 310, § 17, effective January 1 , 2023.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1008 (4).

31-31-809. Termination of benefits.

Except as otherwise provided in section 31-31-807 (2), any benefit provided in accordance with this part 8 to a surviving spouse shall terminate upon the death of the surviving spouse. Any benefit provided in accordance with section 31-31-803 (2) to a surviving spouse of a member who was occupationally disabled shall terminate upon the remarriage of the surviving spouse. Except as otherwise provided in section 31-31-807 (2), any benefit provided in accordance with this part 8 to a dependent child shall terminate upon the death of the dependent child or the termination of dependency of the dependent child.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 934, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 375, § 1, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 426, § 15, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 272, § 6, effective March 29.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-017), ch. 53, p. 192, § 8, effective March 25.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1009.